lang/common/courses/twolc-lexc/2.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+N +Sg +Pl %> +Prop +Der/A
@U.Cap.Obl@ @U.Cap.Opt@


LEXICON Root
@U.Cap.Obl@ prop ;
@U.Cap.Opt@ prop ;

nouns ;

LEXICON nouns
boat m ;
fish m ;
cat m ;
spy m ;
boy m ;
ox OX ;

LEXICON prop
Oslo propinfl ;
Tromssa propinfl ;

LEXICON propinfl
@U.Cap.Obl@ abs ;
@U.Cap.Opt@ der ;

LEXICON abs
+N+Prop+Sg: # ;

LEXICON der
+N+Prop+Der/A:lainen # ;

LEXICON m
+N+Sg: # ;
+N+Pl:%>s # ;

LEXICON OX
+N+Sg: # ;
+N+Pl:%>en # ;
